Wisconsin, session 2025, AB885.
do enact as follows:AB885,11Section 1. 236.45 (3) (b) of the statutes is renumbered 236.45 (3) (b) (intro.) 2and amended to read:AB885,2,83236.45 (3) (b) (intro.) Notwithstanding par. (a) and subs. (1) and (2), a 4municipality may not deny approval of a plat or certified survey map under this 5section or s. 236.10 or 236.13 on the basis of the proposed use of land within the 6extraterritorial plat approval jurisdiction of the municipality, unless the denial is 7based on a plan or regulations, or amendments thereto, adopted by the governing 8body of the municipality under s. 62.23 (7a) (c). on the basis of any of the following:AB885,29Section 2. 236.45 (3) (b) 1. to 4. of the statutes are created to read:AB885,2,1010236.45 (3) (b) 1. The proposed use of the land.AB885,2,11112. Specifications related to public improvements on the land.AB885,2,12123. Land division design standards.AB885,2,13134. An agreement or lack of agreement related to the annexation of the land.AB885,314Section 3. 236.45 (7) of the statutes is created to read:AB885,2,1715236.45 (7) Attorney fees in certain actions. In any action brought by a 16town to enforce sub. (3) (b), the town is entitled to recover reasonable attorney fees 17if the town is the prevailing party.AB885,2,1818